Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.140

Final order issued under RCW 18.235.130—Failure to comply.

If a person or business regulated by this chapter violates or fails to comply with a final order issued under RCW 18.235.130, the attorney general, any prosecuting attorney, the director, the board or commission, or any other person may maintain an action in the name of the state of Washington to enjoin the person from violating the order or failing to comply with the order. The injunction does not relieve the offender from criminal prosecution, but the remedy by injunction is in addition to the liability of the offender to criminal prosecution and disciplinary action.

[ 2002 c 86 s 115.]